Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1201
Act, how cited.

Sections 79-1201 to 79-1249 shall be known and may be cited as the Educational Service Units Act.

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 918;

Laws 1998, LB 1110, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 386, § 2;

Laws 2002, Second Spec. Sess., LB 5, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB603, § 8.